lexc/verb/enhuigeikszt.lexc
LEXICON Caserag
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§ae2§n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§ae2§n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§ae2§ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§ae2§n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§ae2§n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§ae2§ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§ae2§ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^§ae2§ni  #;
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelol§ #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^ik           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§oe2§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§ae2§n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^§oe2§tt§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^§oe2§tt§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattet§t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^§oe2§tt§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^§oe2§tt§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^§oe2§tt§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^§oe2§tt§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^§oe2§tt§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^§oe2§tt§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^§oe2§tt§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^§oe2§tt§igeaa§t§igeo2§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^§oe2§tt§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^§ae2§nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^§ae2§n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^§ae2§n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§ae2§n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§ae2§n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^§ae2§n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^§ae2§n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^§ae2§n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^§ae2§n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^§ae2§n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^§ae2§n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^§ae2§n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^§ae2§n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
!+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^§oe2§tt§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^§ae2§n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né

!LEXICON AddVerbragdz
![stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Caseragdz;

!LEXICON Caseragdz
!+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§ae2§n§igeo§m #;
!+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§ae2§n§igeo§d #;
!+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§ae2§ni§AA§ #;
!+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§ae2§n§igeu§nk #;
!+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§ae2§n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
!+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§ae2§ni§igeu§k #;
!+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§ae2§ni§igeuo§k #;
!+Inf:^+cInf^§ae2§ni  #;
!+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
!+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
!+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
!+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
!+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
!+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
!+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
!+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
!+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
!+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelol§ #;    ! esz, el/ol
!+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^ik           #;    !
!+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
!+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§oe2§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
!+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
!+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§ae2§n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
!+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
!+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
!+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
!+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^§oe2§tt§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
!+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^§oe2§tt§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
!+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattet§t      #;    ! t
!+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^§oe2§tt§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
!+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^§oe2§tt§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
!+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^§oe2§tt§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
!+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^§oe2§tt§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
!+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^§oe2§tt§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
!+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^§oe2§tt§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
!+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^§oe2§tt§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
!+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^§oe2§tt§igeaa§t§igeo2§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
!+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^§oe2§tt§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
!+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
!+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
!+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattet§t      #;    ! t
!+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
!+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
!+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
!+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
!+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
!+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
!+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
!+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaa§t§igeo2§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
!+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
!+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^§ae2§nék               #;    ! nék
!+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^§ae2§n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
!+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^§ae2§n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
!+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§ae2§n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
!+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§ae2§n§igeoo§k #;
!+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^§ae2§n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
!+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^§ae2§n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
!+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^§ae2§n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
!+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^§ae2§n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
!+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^§ae2§n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
!+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^§ae2§n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
!+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^§ae2§n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
!+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^§ae2§n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
!+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
!+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
!+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
!+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
!+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoo§k #;
!+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
!+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
!+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
!+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
!+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
!+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
!+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
!+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
!!+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
!+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^§oe2§tt§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
!+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
!+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^§ae2§n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né
!+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né


LEXICON AddVerbragmely
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Caseragmely;

LEXICON Verb
tajtékzik:tajtékz AddVerbragmely;
